Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 2. Districts; District Courts and Judges.

§ 16.1-69.6.
Establishment of districts.

On and after July 1, 1973, the Commonwealth shall be divided into districts encompassing all counties and cities in the Commonwealth to provide a basis for the sound and efficient administration of the courts not of record, as follows:

The City of Chesapeake shall constitute the first district.

The City of Virginia Beach shall constitute the second district.

The City of Portsmouth shall constitute the third district.

The City of Norfolk shall constitute the fourth district.

The Cities of Franklin and Suffolk and the Counties of Isle of Wight and Southampton shall constitute the fifth district.

The Cities of Emporia and Hopewell and the Counties of Prince George, Surry, Sussex, Greensville and Brunswick shall constitute the sixth district.

The City of Newport News shall constitute the seventh district.

The City of Hampton shall constitute the eighth district.

The Cities of Williamsburg and Poquoson and the Counties of York, James City, Charles City, New Kent, Gloucester, Mathews, Middlesex, King William and King and Queen shall constitute the ninth district.

The Counties of Cumberland, Buckingham, Appomattox, Prince Edward, Charlotte, Lunenburg, Mecklenburg and Halifax shall constitute the tenth district.

The City of Petersburg and the Counties of Dinwiddie, Nottoway, Amelia and Powhatan shall constitute the eleventh district.

The City of Colonial Heights and the County of Chesterfield shall constitute the twelfth district.

The City of Richmond shall constitute the thirteenth district.

The County of Henrico shall constitute the fourteenth district.

The City of Fredericksburg and the Counties of King George, Stafford, Spotsylvania, Caroline, Hanover, Lancaster, Northumberland, Westmoreland, Richmond and Essex shall constitute the fifteenth district.

The City of Charlottesville and the Counties of Madison, Greene, Albemarle, Fluvanna, Goochland, Louisa, Orange and Culpeper shall constitute the sixteenth district.

The County of Arlington and the City of Falls Church shall constitute the seventeenth district.

The City of Alexandria shall constitute the eighteenth district.

The City of Fairfax and the County of Fairfax shall constitute the nineteenth district.

The Counties of Loudoun, Fauquier and Rappahannock shall constitute the twentieth district.

The City of Martinsville and the Counties of Patrick and Henry shall constitute the twenty-first district.

The City of Danville and the Counties of Pittsylvania and Franklin shall constitute the twenty-second district.

The Cities of Roanoke and Salem and the County of Roanoke shall constitute the twenty-third district.

The City of Lynchburg and the Counties of Nelson, Amherst, Campbell and Bedford shall constitute the twenty-fourth district.

The Cities of Covington, Lexington, Staunton, Buena Vista, and Waynesboro and the Counties of Highland, Augusta, Rockbridge, Bath, Alleghany, Botetourt and Craig shall constitute the twenty-fifth district.

The Cities of Harrisonburg and Winchester and the Counties of Frederick, Clarke, Warren, Shenandoah, Page and Rockingham shall constitute the twenty-sixth district.

The Cities of Galax and Radford and the Counties of Pulaski, Wythe, Carroll, Montgomery, Floyd, Giles, Bland and Grayson shall constitute the twenty-seventh district.

The City of Bristol and the Counties of Smyth and Washington shall constitute the twenty-eighth district.

The Counties of Tazewell, Buchanan, Russell and Dickenson shall constitute the twenty-ninth district.

The City of Norton and the Counties of Wise, Scott and Lee shall constitute the thirtieth district.

The Cities of Manassas and Manassas Park, and the County of Prince William shall constitute the thirty-first district.

(2-A)

The Counties of Accomack and Northampton shall constitute district two-A.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1974, c. 297; 1976, c. 126; 1977, c. 5; 1983, c. 149; 1986, c. 405; 1987, c. 624; 1992, c. 744; 2006, c. 861; 2016, cc. 164, 312.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, c. 744, which amended this section, provides that the amendment shall be effective at midnight on December 31, 1992, provided that the consolidation of the County of Alleghany and the City of Clifton Forge shall have been ordered by the Circuit Court of Alleghany prior to that date. However, the consolidation proposal failed when it was presented by referendum. Thus, by direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment to this section by Acts 1992, c. 744 was not given effect.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 861 deleted “The City of South Boston and” at the beginning of subdivision (10) and deleted “Clifton Forge” following “Buena Vista” in subdivision (25).

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 164 and 312 are identical, and substituted “City of Lynchburg” for “Cities of Lynchburg and Bedford” in subdivision (24).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 356.

§ 16.1-69.6:1.
Number of judges.

For the several judicial districts there shall be full-time general district court judges and juvenile and domestic relations district court judges, the maximum number as hereinafter set forth, who shall during their service reside within their respective districts, except as provided in §

16.1-69.16

, and whose compensation and powers shall be the same as now and hereafter prescribed for general district court judges and juvenile and domestic relations district court judges.

The maximum number of judges of the districts shall be as follows:

Juvenile and Domestic
General District Court Relations District
Judges Court Judges First 4 4 Second 7 6 Two-A 2 1 Third 2 3 Fourth 6 5 Fifth 3 2 Sixth 5 3 Seventh 4 4 Eighth 3 3 Ninth 3 4 Tenth 3 3 Eleventh 3 3 Twelfth 5 6 Thirteenth 6 5 Fourteenth 5 5 Fifteenth 8 9 Sixteenth 4 6 Seventeenth 3 2 Eighteenth 2 2 Nineteenth 12 8 Twentieth 4 3 Twenty-first 2 2 Twenty-second 2 4 Twenty-third 4 5 Twenty-fourth 3 6 Twenty-fifth 4 5 Twenty-sixth 5 7 Twenty-seventh 5 5 Twenty-eighth 3 3 Twenty-ninth 2 3 Thirtieth 2 3 Thirty-first 5 5

Click to view

The election or appointment of any district judge shall be subject to the provisions of §

16.1-69.9:3

.

History.

1974, c. 1; 1975, c. 41; 1976, c. 56; 1977, c. 5; 1978, c. 2; 1979, c. 7; 1980, c. 93; 1981, c. 26; 1982, c. 4; 1983, c. 1; 1985, c. 44; 1986, c. 75; 1987, c. 16; 1988, c. 22; 1989, c. 44; 1990, c. 112; 1992, c. 91; 1993, cc. 8, 31; 1994, c. 89; 1994, 1st Sp. Sess., cc. 3, 7; 1995, c. 20; 1996, c. 121; 1997, c. 16; 1998, c. 2; 1999, c. 11; 2000, c. 43; 2001, c. 16; 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4; 2005, cc. 189, 228, 951; 2006, cc. 34, 488; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2; 2014, cc. 812, 822; 2016, c. 728; 2018, cc. 126, 135; 2020, cc. 343, 586.

Third Judicial District General District Court judgeships.

Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822 reduced the number of General District judges from 3 to 2. Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act reducing the number of authorized judgeships in the General District Court of the Third Judicial District shall become effective upon the death, resignation, or retirement on or after January 1, 2014, of any judge of that court.”

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 44, cl. 2 provides that the portion of Acts 1989, c. 44, relating to the twentieth judicial district is effective April 1, 1989, and that the remainder of the act is effective July 1, 1989.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1 and Acts 1996, c. 616, c. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822 reduced the number of General District judges from 3 to 2. Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act reducing the number of authorized judgeships in the General District Court of the Fifth Judicial District shall become effective upon the death, resignation, or retirement on or after January 1, 2014, of any judge of that court.” That number was increased to 3 again in 2018 (and 3 judges currently sit on that bench).

Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822 reduced the number of General District judges from 8 to 6. Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act reducing the number of authorized judgeships in the General District Court of the Thirteenth Judicial District shall become effective upon the death, resignation, or retirement on or after January 1, 2014, of any judge of that court; except that the number of authorized judgeships in the General District Court of the Thirteenth Judicial District shall be reduced to seven on the effective date of this act.” Clause 5 refers to the reduction of judges from 8 to 6 in the 13th General District, with the reduction from 8 to 7 being immediate. This clause has been triggered because there are now only six judges on the bench in the 13th General District.

Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822 reduced the number of General District judges from 5 to 3. Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act reducing the number of authorized judgeships in the General District Court of the Twenty-fifth Judicial District shall become effective upon the death, resignation, or retirement on or after January 1, 2014, of any judge of that court; except that the number of authorized judgeships in the General District Court of the Twenty-fifth Judicial District shall be reduced to four on the effective date of this act.” Effective July 1, 2018, Acts 2016, c. 728, increases the number of General District judges in the Twenty-fifth
Judicial District from “3” to “4.” A 4th judge was elected in during the 2019 Session.

Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822 reduced the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District judges from 5 to 4. Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822, cl. 7 provides: “That the provisions of this act reducing the number of authorized judgeships in the Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court of the Thirteenth Judicial District shall become effective upon the death, resignation, or retirement on or after January 1, 2014, of any judge of that court.” That number was increased to 5 again in 2018, and a 5th judge was elected during the 2019 session.

Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822 reduced the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District judges from 8 to 7. Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822, cl. 8 provides: “That the provisions of this act reducing the number of authorized judgeships in the Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court of the Nineteenth Judicial District shall become effective upon the death, resignation, or retirement on or after January 1, 2014, of any judge of that court.” Effective July 1, 2018, Acts 2016, c. 728, increases the number of judgeships in the Nineteenth Judicial District from “7” to “8.”

Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822, cl. 10 provides: “That the Chief Justice shall utilize her authority to designate any judge serving in any circuit or district where the number of authorized judgeships is reduced under this act after July 1, 2014, to provide judicial assistance to any circuit or district court, as appropriate.”

The 1998 amendment,

increased the number of general district court judges in the second district from 6 to 7, increased the number of juvenile and domestic relations district court judges in the third district from 2 to 3, and in the fourth and thirteenth districts from 4 to 5, and deleted the former paragraph following the twelfth district entry which stated: “The juvenile and domestic relations district court judges of the twelfth district shall render assistance on a regular basis to the juvenile and domestic relations court judges of the thirteenth district by appropriate designation.”

The 1999 amendment

increased the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Judges from six to seven in the Second District, increased the number of General District Court Judges from three to four in the Seventh District, increased the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Judges from five to six in the Fifteenth District, increased the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Judges from three to four in the Sixteenth District, increased the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Judges from four to five in the Twenty-fourth District, increased the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Judges from three to four in the Twenty-fifth district, and increased the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Judges from three to four in the Twenty-sixth district.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 43 increased the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Judges in the fourteenth district from three to four; and inserted the paragraph of text between the fourteenth and fifteenth districts.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 16, in the table listing number of judges in a district, under the heading “General District Court Judges” substituted “4” for “3” in the Sixth and Seventeenth district, and under the heading “Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Judges” substituted “3” for “2” in the Eighth district and “5” for “4” in the Twelfth district; and deleted “The juvenile and domestic relations district court judges of the fourteenth judicial district shall render assistance on a regular basis to the juvenile and domestic relations district court judges of the twelfth judicial district by appropriate designation” preceding the entries for the “Fifteenth District.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, as amended by Acts 2005, c. 951, and Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, effective July
1, 2004, in the table listing number of judges in a district, under the heading “Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Judges” substituted “7” for “6” in the Fifteenth district and “4” for “3” in the Twenty-seventh district.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 189 and 228 are identical, and in the table listing number of judges in a district, under the heading “General District Court Judges” substituted “6” for “5” in the Fifteenth district and under the heading “Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Judges” substituted “3” for “2” in the Twentieth district.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 34 and 488 are identical, and in the table listing number of judges in a district, under the heading “General District Court Judges” substituted “11” for “10” in the Nineteenth district, “4” for “3” in the Twentieth district, and “5” for “4” in the Twenty-seventh district and under the heading “Juvenile and Domestic Relations District Court Judges” substituted “4” for “3” in the Seventh district, “5” for “4” in the Fourteenth district, “8” for “7” in the Nineteenth district, and “5” for “4” in the Twenty-sixth district.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 812 and 822 are identical and inserted “maximum” in the first sentence of the first paragraph and in the second paragraph, and rewrote the table.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 728, effective July 1, 2018, substituted “8” for “7” in the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations District judgeships in the Nineteenth Judicial District and substituted “4” for “3” in the number of General District judgeships in the Twenty-fifth Judicial District.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 126 and 135 are identical, and in the table, increased by one the number of General District Judges in Two-A, fifth, sixth, twenty-first, and twenty-eighth districts, and increased the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations Judges by one in the sixth, thirteenth, and thirtieth districts, and decreased the number of Juvenile and Domestic Relations Judges by one in the second, tenth, and fifteenth districts.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 343 and 586 are identical, and increased the number of General District Court judges in the Nineteenth district from “11” to “12” in the table.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 356.

§ 16.1-69.7.
District courts.

On and after July 1, 1973, in every county and city there shall be one court which shall be called the “ (Name of County
General District Court” and one court which shall be called the or City) “
Juvenile and (Name of County or City)

Click to view

Domestic Relations District Court,” and for each such court there shall be one or more judges who shall be called the judge of such general district court or juvenile and domestic relations district court as appropriate. Unless the General Assembly specifically so provides to the contrary, however, no general district court shall be established in any city in which there is no municipal court with general civil or criminal jurisdiction in operation prior to July 1, 1973, and jurisdiction previously exercised in such city by a county court shall be vested in the general district court of such county.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 356, 372.

§ 16.1-69.7:1.
Establishment of certain district courts.

On and after July 1, 1973, there shall be established in the City of Galax, one general district court and one juvenile and domestic relations district court and for each such court there shall be one or more judges who shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Chapter 4.1 (§

16.1-69.1

et seq.) of Title 16.1. Such courts shall possess all the jurisdiction and exercise all the powers and authority in cases therein granted to district courts according to general law, within the territory which they serve.

Each such judge shall cause to be collected such costs and fees as allowed by law for services performed by judges, clerks, or employees of the district courts. All fines and fees collected shall be accounted for according to general law and city ordinances and paid into the treasury of the city or to the State, whichever may be entitled thereto, pursuant to §

16.1-69.48

.

History.

1976, c. 319.

Editor’s note.

Formerly, this section was not set out in the Code of Virginia. At its April 4, 2017, meeting, the Virginia Code Commission approved setting out the full text.

§ 16.1-69.8.
Existing courts continued and redesignated; exception.

The present system of courts not of record is continued as follows on and after July 1, 1973:

The county court in each county shall continue as the general district court of such county with the same powers and with territorial jurisdiction over such county and over any city within the county for which a municipal court with general civil or criminal jurisdiction or separate general district court has not been established.

The municipal court or courts in each city, excluding juvenile and domestic relations courts, shall continue as the general district court of the city with the same powers and territorial jurisdiction over such city; provided that in the case of more than one such municipal court in operation in any city, all such courts shall be merged on July 1, 1973, and their powers and territorial jurisdiction merged in the general district court.

The juvenile and domestic relations court of each county and city shall continue as the juvenile and domestic relations district court of the county or city with the same powers and territorial jurisdiction as heretofore provided.

The municipal court of any town and/or other court of any town having general civil and criminal jurisdiction however called shall be abolished and all jurisdiction and power conferred upon any such court shall pass to and be exercised by the district courts having jurisdiction over the county wherein the town is located.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 2018, c. 164.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision as to authority of General Assembly with regard to courts, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 14.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 164, in subsection (b), deleted “courts of limited jurisdiction established pursuant to Chapter 5 (§

16.1-70

et seq.) of this title and” preceding “juvenile and domestic relations.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal & Error, § 356.

§ 16.1-69.9.
Judges in office continued; terms of judges; how elected or appointed.

Every judge or justice and every associate, assistant and substitute judge or justice of a court not of record in office January 1, 1973, shall continue in office as a judge or substitute judge of such court under its designation as a general district court or juvenile and domestic relations district court until the expiration of the term for which he was appointed or elected, or until a vacancy shall occur in his office or until a successor shall be appointed or elected, whichever is the latter.

Upon the expiration of such terms, or when a vacancy occurs, successors shall be elected only as authorized pursuant to §§

16.1-69.10

and

16.1-69.14

and for the term and in the manner following:

With respect to terms expiring on or after July 1, 1980, successors to judges shall be elected for a term of six years by the General Assembly as provided in subdivision 2.Any vacancy in the office of any full-time district court judge shall be filled for a full term of six years in the manner prescribed herein; provided that such vacancy shall not be filled except as provided in §

16.1-69.9:3

.

Full-time district court judges shall be elected by the majority of the members elected to each house of the General Assembly. No person shall be elected or reelected to a subsequent term under this section until he has submitted to a criminal history record search and submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect and reports of such searches have been received by the chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary. If the person has not met the requirement of filing in the preceding calendar year a disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

or 30-111, he shall also provide a written statement of economic interests on the disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

to the chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary. The judges of the circuit court having jurisdiction over the district may nominate a panel of no more than three persons for each judgeship within the district who are deemed qualified to hold the office. The General Assembly may consider such nominations in electing a judge to fill the office but may elect a person not on such panel to fill the office. Nominations shall be forwarded to the clerks of both houses of the General Assembly on or before December 15.

No person with a criminal conviction for a felony shall be appointed as a substitute judge.If an appointment is to be made by two or more judges and there is a tie vote, then the senior judge of the circuit court having jurisdiction in the district shall make the appointment.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1975, c. 5; 1976, c. 374; 1977, c. 536; 1980, c. 194; 2004, c. 452; 2018, c. 578.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “House and Senate Committees for Courts of Justice” twice in subdivision 2. March 10, 2021.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 452 inserted the second sentence in subdivision (c); added subdivision (d); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 578 redesignated subdivisions throughout; in subdivision 2, substituted “and submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect and a report of such search has been received” for “and a report of such search has been received” in the second sentence and inserted the third sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on pleading and practice for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1559 (1973).

For an article, “Racial Diversity on the Bench:
Beyond Role Models and Public Confidence,” see 57 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 405 (2000).

§ 16.1-69.9:1.
Appointment, terms, etc., of substitute judges.

Substitute judges shall be appointed by the chief judge of the circuit court having jurisdiction within the district for a term of six years.

Each substitute judge shall be appointed to serve every general district court and every juvenile and domestic relations district court within the judicial district for which the appointment is made.

No person shall be appointed under this section until he has submitted his fingerprints to be used for the conduct of a national criminal records search and a Virginia criminal history records search, submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect, and provided a written statement of economic interests on the disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

. No person with a criminal conviction for a felony shall be appointed as a substitute judge.

History.

1973, c. 546; 1975, c. 334; 2004, c. 452; 2018, c. 578.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section and the enactment of § 16.1-69.9:01, by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 452 added subsection (d).

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 578 redesignated subdivisions throughout; added “submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect, and provided a written statement of economic interests on the disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

” at the end of the first sentence in subsection C.

§ 16.1-69.9:2.
Vacancies in office of judges; terms of successor judges; appointment while General Assembly not in session.

Whenever a vacancy occurs in the office of a full-time district court judge the successor shall be elected for a full term of six years and upon qualification shall enter at once upon the discharge of the duties of his office. But subject to the provisions of §

16.1-69.9:3

, the judges of the circuit having jurisdiction over the district shall have the power while the General Assembly is not in session to fill pro tempore vacancies in the office of full-time district court judges. Appointment to every such vacancy shall be by commission to expire at the end of thirty days after the commencement of the next session of the General Assembly.

History.

1973, c. 546; 1980, c. 194; 2001, c. 256.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 256 substituted “while the General Assembly is not in session” for “during the recess of the General Assembly” in the second sentence, and deleted “Such” at the beginning of the last sentence.

§ 16.1-69.9:3.
Investigation and certification of necessity before vacancies filled.

When a vacancy occurs in the office of any judge of any district, the vacancy shall not be filled until, after investigation, the Committee on District Courts certifies that the filling of the vacancy is necessary. The Committee shall publish notice of such certification in a publication of general circulation among attorneys licensed to practice in the Commonwealth. No notice of retirement submitted under §

51.1-305

or §

51.1-307

shall be revoked after certification of the vacancy by the Committee. If the Committee certifies that the filling of the vacancy is not necessary, it shall direct the manner of distributing the work created by the vacancy, and the vacancy shall not be filled if not certified as necessary.

History.

1973, c. 546; 1975, c. 101; 1999, c. 319; 2004, c. 331.

The 1999 amendment

added the second sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 331 inserted the third sentence.

§ 16.1-69.9:4.
Same; election of successor judges.

Whenever a vacancy occurs or exists in the office of a full-time district judge while the General Assembly is in session, or whenever the term of a full-time judge of a district court will expire or the office will be vacated at a date certain between the adjournment of the General Assembly and the commencement of the next session of the General Assembly, a successor judge may be elected at any time during a session preceding the date of such vacancy, by the vote of a majority of the members elected to each house of the General Assembly, for a full term of six years and, upon qualification, the successor judge shall enter at once upon the discharge of the duties of his office. However, such successor judge shall not enter upon the discharge of his duties prior to the commencement of his term of office. No person shall be elected or reelected to a subsequent term under this section until he has submitted to a criminal history record search and submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect and reports of such searches have been received by the chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary. If the person has not met the requirement of filing in the preceding calendar year a disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

or 30-111, he shall also provide a written statement of economic interests on the disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

to the chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary.

History.

1973, c. 546; 1993, c. 368; 2004, c. 452; 2018, c. 578.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “House and Senate Committees for Courts of Justice.” March 10, 2021.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 452 added the last sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 578 substituted “and submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect and reports of such searches have been received” for “and a report of such search has been received” in the third sentence and added the last sentence.

Law Review.

For an article, “Racial Diversity on the Bench:
Beyond Role Models and Public Confidence,” see 57 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 405 (2000).

§ 16.1-69.10.
Number of judges.

The number of general district court judges and juvenile and domestic relations district court judges, excluding substitute judges, shall be determined as follows:

Judges in office on January 1, 1973, shall be permitted to complete their terms pursuant to §

16.1-69.9

;

[Repealed.]

On and after January 1, 1974, the number of judges authorized in each district shall be determined by the General Assembly based on the requirement that all judges whose terms commence on and after July 1, 1980, serve on a full-time basis; and

On and after July 1, 1980, the number of judges authorized in each district by the General Assembly shall be based on the requirement that no district judge whose term commences on or after July 1, 1980, shall be elected to serve in more than one district or to serve both a general district court and juvenile and domestic relations district court in any district; provided, however, that a judge may serve more than one general district court or more than one juvenile and domestic relations district court in one district. The Committee on District Courts shall make a study and report to the General Assembly on or before December 1 of each year on the number of judges needed and the districts for which they should be authorized. If the Committee recommends the creation of an additional judgeship in any district, it shall publish notice of such recommendation in a publication of general circulation among attorneys licensed to practice in the Commonwealth.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1980, c. 194; 1999, c. 319.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 1999 amendment

added the last sentence in subdivision (d).

§ 16.1-69.11.
Chief judges; judges; substitute judges.

Judges of the district courts shall be designated as follows:

In each district there shall be one chief general district judge and one chief juvenile and domestic relations district judge who shall serve as such for a term of two years commencing July 1 of the even-numbered years. The chief district judges shall be designated by judges of the district court having jurisdiction in the district. If the designation is to be made by more than one judge and there is a tie vote, then the chief circuit judge having jurisdiction in the district shall make the designation. The incumbent chief judge shall call for an election at the conclusion of the term as chief judge and shall report the results of such election forthwith to the office of the Executive Secretary. The incumbent chief judge may succeed himself;

Each judge, except substitute judges, shall be designated either general district court judge or juvenile and domestic relations district court judge depending on the court he is so designated to serve; the terms “associate judge” and “assistant judge” shall no longer be applicable and wherever such terms appear in the Code of Virginia they shall be deemed to refer to either general district court judges or juvenile and domestic relations court judges as appropriate;

Substitute judges shall continue to be designated as such.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1975, c. 334; 1976, c. 374.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

§ 16.1-69.11:1.
Acting chief judge.

If the chief judge of a district court is unable to perform the duties required by law, the chief judge shall notify the other judges of such district court, or if the chief judge is unable to notify the other judges, the judge longest in continuous service who is available shall provide such notice, and the judge longest in continuous service who is available shall be the acting chief judge, and perform such duties during the chief judge’s absence. If two or more judges of such district court have served for the same period, the judge most senior in years shall be the acting chief judge. Upon assuming such duties, the acting chief judge shall immediately notify the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court and the other judges of such district court.

When the chief judge is able to resume the duties of chief judge, the chief judge shall immediately notify the Executive Secretary and the other judges of such district court, and thereupon shall resume such duties.

History.

2010, cc. 560, 596.

§ 16.1-69.12.
Limitations on practice of law by judges.

A general district court judge or juvenile and domestic relations district court judge elected as a full-time judge for a term commencing on or after July 1, 1980, shall be prohibited from engaging in the practice of law.

[Repealed.]

Substitute judges shall not appear as counsel in any civil or criminal case arising out of the circumstances which were involved in any other case brought before them.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1980, c. 194.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

§ 16.1-69.13.
Repealed by Acts 2018, c. 164, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

16.1-69.13

, pertaining to compensation and benefits of judges in office on July 1, 1973, for the duration of his term of office, and for each additional consecutive term thereafter, but not longer than July 1, 1980, was enacted by Acts 1972, c. 708, and amended by Acts 1973, c. 546.

§ 16.1-69.14.
Number of substitute judges.

The number of substitute judges shall be determined as follows:

Substitute judges in office on June 30, 1975, shall be permitted to complete their terms;

Subject to the expiration of such terms, the Committee on District Courts shall determine the number of substitute judges for each district which shall be necessary for the effective administration of justice. In determining the total number of substitute judges authorized for each district, the Committee shall consider, among other factors, the number of full-time and part-time judges serving the district.

History.

1972, c. 708; 1973, c. 546; 1975, c. 334.